Washington statutes.
RCW 35.70.040

Council's resolution and notice—Adoption.

If upon receiving a report from the proper officer, the city or town council deems the construction of the proposed sidewalk necessary or convenient for the public it shall by an appropriate resolution order the sidewalk constructed and shall cause a written notice to be served upon the owner of each parcel of land abutting upon that portion and side of the street where the sidewalk is constructed requiring him or her to construct the sidewalk in accordance with the resolution.

[ 2009 c 549 s 2120; 1965 c 7 s 35.70.040. Prior: 1915 c 149 s 2, part; RRS s 9156, part.]